Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.17, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1020.17. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board may
promulgate rules under Article I of the Administrative Procedures
Act which establish a proper spacing of wells which, in its
judgment, is necessary to an orderly withdrawal of water in relation
to the allocation, by regular permits and temporary permits, of
water to the land overlying the basin or subbasin. The Board shall
conduct at least one public hearing at a location within or in close
proximity to each major basin or subbasin before adopting rules
establishing well spacing for such basin or subbasin may adopt
specific spacing for each basin as part of establishing a maximum
annual yield pursuant to Section 1020.6 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1509 Page 2